Wyoming, session 2025, HB0107.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-227 is created to read:

9-4-227. Wyoming generational investment account.

HB0107

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0464
(a) There is created the Wyoming generational
investment account. The account shall consist of all funds
transferred or appropriated to the account by law. All
monies deposited or transferred into the account are
inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust
fund, subject to the provisions for the withdrawal of funds
provided by this section.

(b) The state treasurer shall invest all funds within
the Wyoming generational investment account in accordance
with W.S. 9-4-715(a) and (c) through (e) and 9-4-716. W.S.
9-4-716(e) shall not apply to the account. The state
treasurer, or the treasurer's designee, which shall be
registered under the federal Investment Advisor's Act of
1940, as amended and if required to be registered by the
terms of that act, may invest the unobligated, unencumbered
balance of the account in equities, including stocks of
corporations. The account shall be invested so that the
overall risk profile of the account's investments shall not
materially exceed the risk profile of a reference portfolio
that consists of eighty-five percent (85%) private equity
and fifteen percent (15%) private credit investments. In
adopting investment policy statements for the account, the
HB0107

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0464
board shall seek to preserve the balance of the account in
a manner that strives for the highest possible
risk-adjusted total net return consistent with an
appropriate level of safety and liquidity, giving
consideration to the account's potential extended
investment period and the extended period during which
monies in the account may be ineligible for withdrawal.

(c) Beginning on July 1, 2025 and on each July 1
thereafter, the state auditor shall transfer one hundred
million dollars ($100,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is
available, from the legislative stabilization reserve
account to the Wyoming generational investment account. The
transfer under this subsection shall occur after all other
transfers and appropriations from the legislative
stabilization reserve account required by law are made.

(d) Transfers made under subsection (c) of this
section, and the investment of those transfers, shall be in
accordance with all of the following:

(i) The state treasurer shall separately account
for each annual transfer made under subsection (c) of this
HB0107

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0464
section and shall separately account for all earnings from
each annual transfer;

(ii) Annual transfers shall not be withdrawn
from the account;

(iii) Investment earnings from each annual
transfer shall not be withdrawn except in accordance with
subsection (e) of this section.

(e) On July 1 of each fiscal year after fourteen (14)
fiscal years have elapsed, all investment earnings in the
Wyoming generational investment account arising from the
annual transfer to the account made fourteen (14) fiscal
years earlier shall be deposited in the general fund. For
purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Investment earnings" mean all interest
income, dividends, realized capital gains and returned
capital;

HB0107

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0464
(ii) Investment earnings shall be distributed
under this subsection as the earnings are received or when
the fund from which earnings are derived matures;

(iii) The state treasurer may liquidate or sell
investments in order to maximize earnings or minimize costs
associated with making the deposit required under this
subsection.

(f) Not later than October 1 of each year, the state
treasurer shall report to the joint appropriations
committee and the select committee on capital financing and
investments regarding the investment of funds in the
Wyoming generational investment account. The report shall
include information on the annual review of the account's
investment policy statement and an estimate of investment
earnings available for deposit to the general fund for the
immediately succeeding fiscal year.

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-203(a)(xiii) and 9-4-716(e) are
amended to read:

9-4-203. Definitions.
HB0107

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0464

(a) As used in this act:

(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 9-4-202 through
9-4-226 9-4-227.

9-4-716. State investment policy; investment
consultant.

(e) In investing monies of a fund or account which
may be invested in stock of a corporation or other
equities, the overall risk profile of the investments,
excluding any specific public purpose investment authorized
or directed by the legislature, shall not materially exceed
the risk profile of a reference portfolio that consists of
seventy percent (70%) global equities and thirty percent
(30%) domestic fixed income investments. The state
treasurer after consultation with the investment funds
committee shall submit to the board the committee's
recommendations of specific benchmarks for the measurement
of the portfolio risk characteristics. The specific
benchmarks shall be determined by the board. Any provision
of law which restricts or expands the investment of a
HB0107

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0464
specific fund or account to a greater degree than the
provisions of this subsection shall control over this
subsection.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0107